Wyoming, session 2026, HB0182.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-1-122 is created to read:

36-1-122. Designation of land as a state heritage
site.

HB0182

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0437
(a) When the designation is consistent with the
greatest long-term benefit of the state land trust
beneficiaries, the board may designate specific parcels of
state land as a state heritage site if the board finds that
the land possesses exceptional archeological, historical or
cultural value that would be irreparably degraded by
industrial use on the land.

(b) The board may consider state lands for
designation as a state heritage site under this section on
its own motion. In addition, any citizen of Wyoming, the
legislature, any local government entity, a tribal
government of either the Northern Arapaho or Eastern
Shoshone tribes or the state archeologist may nominate
lands for designation as a state heritage site under this
section by making an application to the department of state
parks and cultural resources. The department of state parks
and cultural resources shall review any state lands
nominated for designation as a state heritage site under
this subsection and shall provide a recommendation to the
board after consultation with the Wyoming parks and
cultural resources commission and the state historic
preservation office.
HB0182

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0437

(c) Any lands designated by the board as a state
heritage site, after consideration of any recommendation
under subsection (b) of this section, shall be subject to
the following:

(i) The board shall not authorize any industrial
use on the state heritage site or on any surrounding lands
that significantly impairs the visual integrity or
archaeological, historical or cultural value of the site;

(ii) The board shall consider the issuance of
leases of the state heritage site for the greatest benefit
to trust beneficiaries, including leases for:

(A) Educational and research programs;

(B) Sustainable tourism related activities,
including guided tours of the state heritage site;

(C) Recreational use that the board finds
will not deplete, destroy or permanently alter the state
heritage site.
HB0182

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0437

Section 2. W.S. 36-1-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) and 36-4-104 by creating a new subsection
(g) are amended to read:

36-1-101. Definitions.

(a) Unless the context indicates otherwise, as used
in this act:

(ix) "Greatest benefit" or "greatest long-term
benefit" shall include a consideration of the long-term
protection of the financial and intrinsic value of the
land. For any land designated as a state heritage site,
"greatest benefit" shall include a consideration of the
need to mitigate any depletion or alteration of the state
heritage site.

36-4-104. Powers; interpretive service agreements.

(g) The department, in consultation with the
commission and the state historic preservation office,
shall accept applications for designation of state lands as
HB0182

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0437
a state heritage site and shall make recommendations to the
board of land commissioners as provided by W.S.
36-1-122(b).

Section 3. The legislature hereby nominates the
Glenrock buffalo jump as described in the national register
of historic places for designation as a state heritage site
under W.S. 36-1-122 as created by section 1 of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0182